Kentucky statutes. TITLE XXIII Private Corporations and Associations
Amendment of Bylaws

271B.10-200.
Amendment by board of directors or shareholders.

A corporation’s board of directors may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws unless:

The articles of incorporation or this chapter reserve this power exclusively to the shareholders in whole or part; or

The shareholders in amending or repealing a particular bylaw provide expressly that the board of directors may not amend or repeal that bylaw.

A corporation’s shareholders may amend or repeal the corporation’s bylaws even though the bylaws may also be amended or repealed by its board of directors.

A shareholder of the corporation shall not have a vested property right resulting from any provision in the bylaws.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 112, effective January 1, 1989; 2017 ch. 193, § 8, effective June 29, 2017.

271B.10-220.
Bylaw increasing quorum or voting requirements for directors.

A bylaw that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may be amended or repealed:

If originally adopted by the shareholders, only by the shareholders; or

If originally adopted by the board of directors, either by the shareholders or by the board of directors.

A bylaw adopted or amended by the shareholders that fixes a greater quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors may provide that it may be amended or repealed only by a specified vote of either the shareholders or the board of directors.

Action by the board of directors under subsection (1)(b) of this section to adopt or amend a bylaw that changes the quorum or voting requirement for the board of directors shall meet the same quorum requirement and be adopted by the same vote required to take action under the quorum and voting requirement then in effect or proposed to be adopted, whichever is greater.

History.

Enact. Acts 1988, ch. 23, § 113, effective January 1, 1989.